Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 2. Airport Authority

§ 10-5-201.
Authority of county commissioners to levy taxes and issue bonds; funds to be paid into “airport fund”; expenditure generally.

For the purposes of W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

, the board of county commissioners may levy taxes, issue bonds or incur indebtedness as authorized by law for other county purposes. The board of county commissioners by resolution may also issue revenue bonds, notes, warrants and other revenue securities in the manner provided by W.S.

35-2-424

through

35-2-435

, as from time to time amended, for trustees of hospital districts for the purposes of W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

. All taxes collected, together with other monies received from the sale of bonds, cities or towns, rents and revenue, donations, federal grants and aid or other sources for this purpose, shall be placed in an airport fund which shall be expended only by the authority provided by law.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 57, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 10-37.1; Laws 1973, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-102; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1.

§ 10-5-202.
Airport board; organization; corporate powers; personal liability; compensation; appointment of manager.

The authority and powers granted in W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

and the control of funds named may be under the control of an airport board. Upon majority vote of board members the board may issue revenue bonds, notes, warrants and other revenue securities in the same manner provided by W.S.

35-2-424

through

35-2-435

for trustees of hospital districts for the purposes of W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

. The board shall be appointed by the municipal or county governing body and consist of five (5) members, all of whom shall be qualified electors of the county in which they serve. One (1) member of the board to be appointed for one (1) year; one (1) for two (2) years; one (1) for three (3) years; one (1) for four (4) years; and one (1) for five (5) years, and in each case until the first Monday in February following the expiration of the year. The municipal or county governing body in their January meeting of each year shall appoint a successor to the board member whose term shall expire during the year. Thereafter appointments for a full term shall be for five (5) years. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled by appointment by the municipal or county governing body.

The board shall organize each year by selecting a president, a vice president, a secretary and a treasurer from its membership. The secretary shall notify the municipal or county governing body of the board’s organization and shall file with the county clerk and the secretary of state a certificate showing their organization. Upon the filing of the certificate the airport board shall become a body corporate, empowered to sue and be sued under the name and style of “ . . . . . Airport Board” and shall be the successor to any similar organization or corporation. The corporation shall have perpetual existence. No individual member of the board shall be personally liable for any action or procedure of the board. Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to payment for travel and other necessary expenses incurred while attending to business or meetings of the board.

Meetings of the board shall be held quarterly at a place designated by the board and at other times as may be desirable upon call of the airport board.

The board may appoint a full or part time manager and other personnel as necessary to operate and maintain the airport and its allied facilities and pay to appointees a reasonable compensation as the board deems proper.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 57, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 10-37.2; Laws 1973, ch. 133, § 1; 1977, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-103; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1993, ch. 18, § 1; 1999, ch. 126, § 1; 2005, ch. 207, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging allowance and expenses for state officers or employees, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted language at the end of the second sentence in (a) to eliminate specific requirements for bonding by airport boards.

Board authority to purchase property.—

Airport board had the statutory authority to issue revenue bonds to fund the purchase of intangible property, including goodwill, as the plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

10-5-202

revealed an intent not to restrict what could be purchased, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

10-5-101

included no limitation between tangible and intangible property. Herrick v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 118, 452 P.3d 1276,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 10-5-203.
Airport board; dissolution and discontinuance.

Any airport board, created under W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

, may be dissolved by resolution of the municipal or county governing body in a regular and public meeting. No board will be dissolved within the two (2) year period following the date of its creation. Within ninety (90) days after the passage of a resolution dissolving the board, the board shall proceed to terminate its existence. After payment of all obligations, any monies remaining under the control of the board shall be credited to the general fund of the municipality or county and be apportioned among the bodies politic comprising the board in the same manner as the cost of maintaining the board was apportioned among the bodies politic and credited to their respective general funds.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 57, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 10-37.3; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-104; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

§ 10-5-204.
Airport board; withdrawal of bodies politic.

Any municipality or county may withdraw from the board by resolution of its governing body. No municipality or county may withdraw from a board within the two (2) year period following the establishment of the board and then only after ninety (90) days written notice given to the board and to the other sponsoring political bodies. In the event of withdrawal of a body politic from the board, any funds which had been appropriated by the municipality or county before withdrawal, to cover its proportionate share of maintaining the board, shall not be returned to the municipality or county withdrawing.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 57, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 10-37.4; W.S. 1977, § 10-4-105; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.